Hawaii statutes.
[§200-48] Derelict vessel. A vessel
which has been left unattended for a continuous period of more than twenty-four
hours is a derelict if:

(1) The vessel is sunk or in immediate danger of
sinking, is obstructing a waterway, or is endangering life or property; or

(2) The vessel has been moored or otherwise left in
the waters of the State or on public property contrary to law, or rules having
the force and effect of law, or the vessel has been left on private property
without authorization of the owner or occupant of the property and if:

(A) The vessel's registration certificate or
marine document has expired and the registered owner no longer resided at the
address listed in the vessel registration or marine document records of the
department or the United States Coast Guard;

(B) The last registered owner of record
disclaims ownership and the current owner's name or address cannot be
determined;

(C) The vessel identification numbers and
other means of identification have been removed so as to hinder or nullify
efforts to locate or identify the owner; or

(D) The vessel registration records of the
department and the marine document records of the United States Coast Guard
contain no record that the vessel has ever been registered or documented and the
owner's name or address cannot be determined. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Case Notes

A vessel and its
accompanying mooring and live-aboard permits are constitutionally protected
"property", of which an individual may not be deprived without notice
and an opportunity to be heard. 91 H. 1, 979 P.2d 586.

Where an owner's
right to a hearing subsequent to impoundment of a derelict vessel was not
clearly established under §200-49, this section, or other law at the time of
state boating officer's actions, it was not unreasonable for officers to have
believed it was lawful to dispose of vessel without a hearing; thus officers,
in individual capacities, entitled to qualified immunity in 42 U.S.C. §1983
action. 91 H. 1, 979 P2d 586.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next